Nebraska, session 109, LB1208.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1208 LB1208
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1001 Sections 79-1001 to 79-1033 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act.
Sec. 2. For school fiscal year 2026-27 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, each local system shall budget general fund expenditures for
salaries and benefits for teachers in an amount equal to or greater than
fifty percent of the total general fund budget of expenditures for such
school fiscal year.
Sec. 3. Original section 79-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-